Illinois, session 104th, HB969.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Toll Bridge Act is amended by changing 5Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 115/0.01)  (from Ch. 137, par. 0.01)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Toll Bridge Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)